District of Columbia statutes.
44-417

Immunity from civil liability.

No member of the SHCC or the SHPDA may be held personally liable in any civil action taken in the course of carrying out his or her official duties and responsibilities as set forth in this chapter or the rules issued pursuant to this chapter.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 18, 43 DCR 4535
1981 Ed., § 32-367.